North Dakota, session 69, SB2092.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsections 7 and 8 of section 26.1-33.4-02 of the North Dakota
Century Code are amended and reenacted as follows:
7. Licenses may be renewed annually on or before April thirtieth upon payment of the periodic
renewal fee. As specified in subsection 2, the renewal fee for a provider may not exceed a
reasonable fee. Failure to pay the fee within the terms prescribed results in the automatic
revocation of the license requiring periodic renewal. A license issued after January first is not
required to renew until April thirtieth of the following calendar year. A license issued between
May 1, 2023, and July 31, 2023, is not required to be renewed until April 30, 2025.
8. The term of provider license must be equal to that of a domestic stock life insurance company
and the term of a broker license must be equal to that of an insurance producer license.
Licenses requiring periodic renewal may be renewed on or before April thirtieth upon payment
of the periodic renewal fee as specified in subsection 2. Failure to pay the fees before the
expiration of the renewal date results in expiration of the license. A license issued after
January first is not required to be renewed until April thirtieth of the following calendar year. A
license issued between May 1, 2023, and July 31, 2023, is not required to be renewed until
April 30, 2025.

S. B. NO. 2092 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2092.
Senate Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 0 Absent 1
House Vote: Yeas 89 Nays 0 Absent 5
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State